Utah statutes.
55-5a-4.   Issuance of permits -- Eligibility -- Fee -- Local license or
permit.
(1) The division may adopt rules and regulations, prescribe procedures, adopt
forms and applications, review applications for permits, and issue permits as
required by Section 55-5a-3 subject to the following:
(a)  A product shall be considered "blind-made" if 75% or more of the direct
labor hours required for its manufacture are provided by the blind.
(b)  A person or organization shall be considered to be selling blind-made
products if 60% or more of the wholesale cost of the seller's average
inventory of products is blind-made and the seller clearly differentiates by
the use of labels or other markings between blind-made products and other
products.
(c)  Individuals or businesses are conducting sales by the blind if 75% or
more of the direct labor hours in packaging, marketing, soliciting and making
sales are provided by the blind.
(d)  Upon receipt of appropriate documentation indicating qualification of a
person or organization seeking a license under this act, the division shall
issue permits for any one, or a combination of the following: sale of products
manufactured by the blind, sale of blind-made products by the blind, and sale
by the blind of products not made by the blind.
(e)  No permit shall be issued by the division if the business name, trade
name or logo of the organization seeking the permit is similar to the name of
or in any way implies an affiliation with or support of the state or one of
its agencies or subdivisions if the organization is not so affiliated.
(2)  A fee of not more than $5 shall be charged for the issuance and renewal
of each permit which shall be valid for a period of one year unless earlier
revoked for good cause shown.
(3)  No political subdivision of this state shall issue any license or permit
whatsoever to sell blind-made goods, articles or products unless the person
applying for that license or permit has first obtained a valid permit issued
by the division.
